Illinois, session 104th, SB2276.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 207 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/207)  (from Ch. 120, par. 2-207)7    Sec. 207. Net Losses. 8    (a) If after applying all of the (i) modifications 9provided for in paragraph (2) of Section 203(b), paragraph (2) 10of Section 203(c) and paragraph (2) of Section 203(d) and (ii) 11the allocation and apportionment provisions of Article 3 of 12this Act and subsection (c) of this Section, the taxpayer's 13net income results in a loss;14        (1) for any taxable year ending prior to December 31, 15    1999, such loss shall be allowed as a carryover or 16    carryback deduction in the manner allowed under Section 17    172 of the Internal Revenue Code;18        (2) for any taxable year ending on or after December 19    31, 1999 and prior to December 31, 2003, such loss shall be 20    allowed as a carryback to each of the 2 taxable years 21    preceding the taxable year of such loss and shall be a net 22    operating loss carryover to each of the 20 taxable years 23    following the taxable year of such loss;  SB2276- 2 -LRB104 03809 HLH 13833 b1        (3) for any taxable year ending on or after December 2    31, 2003 and prior to December 31, 2021, such loss shall be 3    allowed as a net operating loss carryover to each of the 12 4    taxable years following the taxable year of such loss, 5    except as provided in subsection (d); and6        (4) for any taxable year ending on or after December 7    31, 2021, and for any net loss incurred in a taxable year 8    prior to a taxable year ending on or after December 31, 9    2021 for which the statute of limitation for utilization 10    of such net loss has not expired, such loss shall be 11    allowed as a net operating loss carryover to each of the 20 12    taxable years following the taxable year of such loss, 13    except as provided in subsection (d). 14    (a-5) Election to relinquish carryback and order of 15application of losses.16            (A) For losses incurred in tax years ending prior 17        to December 31, 2003, the taxpayer may elect to 18        relinquish the entire carryback period with respect to 19        such loss. Such election shall be made in the form and 20        manner prescribed by the Department and shall be made 21        by the due date (including extensions of time) for 22        filing the taxpayer's return for the taxable year in 23        which such loss is incurred, and such election, once 24        made, shall be irrevocable.25            (B) The entire amount of such loss shall be 26        carried to the earliest taxable year to which such   SB2276- 3 -LRB104 03809 HLH 13833 b1        loss may be carried. The amount of such loss which 2        shall be carried to each of the other taxable years 3        shall be the excess, if any, of the amount of such loss 4        over the sum of the deductions for carryback or 5        carryover of such loss allowable for each of the prior 6        taxable years to which such loss may be carried.7    (b) Any loss determined under subsection (a) of this 8Section must be carried back or carried forward in the same 9manner for purposes of subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 10of this Act as for purposes of subsections (c) and (d) of 11Section 201 of this Act.12    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, for 13each taxable year ending on or after December 31, 2008, for 14purposes of computing the loss for the taxable year under 15subsection (a) of this Section and the deduction taken into 16account for the taxable year for a net operating loss 17carryover under paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subsection (a) 18of this Section, the loss and net operating loss carryover 19shall be reduced in an amount equal to the reduction to the net 20operating loss and net operating loss carryover to the taxable 21year, respectively, required under Section 108(b)(2)(A) of the 22Internal Revenue Code, multiplied by a fraction, the numerator 23of which is the amount of discharge of indebtedness income 24that is excluded from gross income for the taxable year (but 25only if the taxable year ends on or after December 31, 2008) 26under Section 108(a) of the Internal Revenue Code and that   SB2276- 4 -LRB104 03809 HLH 13833 b1would have been allocated and apportioned to this State under 2Article 3 of this Act but for that exclusion, and the 3denominator of which is the total amount of discharge of 4indebtedness income excluded from gross income under Section 5108(a) of the Internal Revenue Code for the taxable year. The 6reduction required under this subsection (c) shall be made 7after the determination of Illinois net income for the taxable 8year in which the indebtedness is discharged. 9    (d) In the case of a corporation (other than a Subchapter S 10corporation):11        (1) no carryover deduction shall be allowed under this 12    Section for any taxable year ending after December 31, 13    2010 and prior to December 31, 2012; 14        (2) no carryover deduction shall exceed $100,000 for 15    any taxable year ending on or after December 31, 2012 and 16    prior to December 31, 2014 and for any taxable year ending 17    on or after December 31, 2021 and prior to December 31, 18    2024; and19        (3) no carryover deduction shall exceed $500,000 for 20    any taxable year ending on or after December 31, 2024 and 21    prior to December 31, 2025 December 31, 2027. 22    For the purposes of determining the taxable years to which 23a net loss may be carried under subsection (a) of this Section, 24no taxable year for which a deduction is disallowed under this 25subsection, or for which the deduction would exceed $100,000 26or $500,000, as applicable, if not for this subsection, shall   SB2276- 5 -LRB104 03809 HLH 13833 b1be counted. 2    (e) In the case of a residual interest holder in a real 3estate mortgage investment conduit subject to Section 860E of 4the Internal Revenue Code, the net loss in subsection (a) 5shall be equal to: 6        (1) the amount computed under subsection (a), without 7    regard to this subsection (e), or if that amount is 8    positive, zero; 9        (2) minus an amount equal to the amount computed under 10    subsection (a), without regard to this subsection (e), 11    minus the amount that would be computed under subsection 12    (a) if the taxpayer's federal taxable income were computed 13    without regard to Section 860E of the Internal Revenue 14    Code and without regard to this subsection (e). 15    The modification in this subsection (e) is exempt from the 16provisions of Section 250. 17(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-669, eff. 11-16-21; 18103-592, eff. 6-7-24.) 19    Section 10. The Business Corporation Act of 1983 is 20amended by changing Sections 15.35 and 15.65 as follows: 21    (805 ILCS 5/15.35)  (from Ch. 32, par. 15.35)22    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-16, 103-8, and 103-592)23    Sec. 15.35. Franchise taxes payable by domestic 24corporations. For the privilege of exercising its franchises   SB2276- 6 -LRB104 03809 HLH 13833 b1in this State, each domestic corporation shall pay to the 2Secretary of State the following franchise taxes, computed on 3the basis, at the rates and for the periods prescribed in this 4Act:5        (a) An initial franchise tax at the time of filing its 6    first report of issuance of shares.7        (b) An additional franchise tax at the time of filing 8    (1) a report of the issuance of additional shares, or (2) a 9    report of an increase in paid-in capital without the 10    issuance of shares, or (3) an amendment to the articles of 11    incorporation or a report of cumulative changes in paid-in 12    capital, whenever any amendment or such report discloses 13    an increase in its paid-in capital over the amount thereof 14    last reported in any document, other than an annual 15    report, interim annual report or final transition annual 16    report required by this Act to be filed in the office of 17    the Secretary of State.18        (c) An additional franchise tax at the time of filing 19    a report of paid-in capital following a statutory merger 20    or consolidation, which discloses that the paid-in capital 21    of the surviving or new corporation immediately after the 22    merger or consolidation is greater than the sum of the 23    paid-in capital of all of the merged or consolidated 24    corporations as last reported by them in any documents, 25    other than annual reports, required by this Act to be 26    filed in the office of the Secretary of State; and in   SB2276- 7 -LRB104 03809 HLH 13833 b1    addition, the surviving or new corporation shall be liable 2    for a further additional franchise tax on the paid-in 3    capital of each of the merged or consolidated corporations 4    as last reported by them in any document, other than an 5    annual report, required by this Act to be filed with the 6    Secretary of State from their taxable year end to the next 7    succeeding anniversary month or, in the case of a 8    corporation which has established an extended filing 9    month, the extended filing month of the surviving or new 10    corporation; however if the taxable year ends within the 11    2-month period immediately preceding the anniversary month 12    or, in the case of a corporation which has established an 13    extended filing month, the extended filing month of the 14    surviving or new corporation the tax will be computed to 15    the anniversary month or, in the case of a corporation 16    which has established an extended filing month, the 17    extended filing month of the surviving or new corporation 18    in the next succeeding calendar year.19        (d) An annual franchise tax payable each year with the 20    annual report which the corporation is required by this 21    Act to file.22    On or after January 1, 2020 and prior to January 1, 2021, 23the first $30 in liability is exempt from the tax imposed under 24this Section. On or after January 1, 2021, and prior to January 251, 2024, the first $1,000 in liability is exempt from the tax 26imposed under this Section. On or after January 1, 2024, and   SB2276- 8 -LRB104 03809 HLH 13833 b1before January 1, 2025, the first $5,000 in liability is 2exempt from the tax imposed under this Section. On and after 3January 1, 2025 and before January 1, 2026, the first $10,000 4in liability is exempt from the tax imposed under this 5Section. The provisions of this Section shall not require the 6payment of any franchise tax that would otherwise have been 7due and payable on or after January 1, 2026. There shall be no 8refunds or proration of franchise tax for any taxes due and 9payable on or after January 1, 2026 on the basis that a portion 10of the corporation's taxable year extends beyond January 1, 112026. 12    This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027. 13(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 14103-592, eff. 6-7-24.) 15    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-282, 102-558, 103-8, and 16103-592)17    Sec. 15.35. Franchise taxes payable by domestic 18corporations. For the privilege of exercising its franchises 19in this State, each domestic corporation shall pay to the 20Secretary of State the following franchise taxes, computed on 21the basis, at the rates and for the periods prescribed in this 22Act:23        (a) An initial franchise tax at the time of filing its 24    first report of issuance of shares.25        (b) An additional franchise tax at the time of filing   SB2276- 9 -LRB104 03809 HLH 13833 b1    (1) a report of the issuance of additional shares, or (2) a 2    report of an increase in paid-in capital without the 3    issuance of shares, or (3) an amendment to the articles of 4    incorporation or a report of cumulative changes in paid-in 5    capital, whenever any amendment or such report discloses 6    an increase in its paid-in capital over the amount thereof 7    last reported in any document, other than an annual 8    report, interim annual report or final transition annual 9    report required by this Act to be filed in the office of 10    the Secretary of State.11        (c) An additional franchise tax at the time of filing 12    a report of paid-in capital following a statutory merger 13    or consolidation, which discloses that the paid-in capital 14    of the surviving or new corporation immediately after the 15    merger or consolidation is greater than the sum of the 16    paid-in capital of all of the merged or consolidated 17    corporations as last reported by them in any documents, 18    other than annual reports, required by this Act to be 19    filed in the office of the Secretary of State; and in 20    addition, the surviving or new corporation shall be liable 21    for a further additional franchise tax on the paid-in 22    capital of each of the merged or consolidated corporations 23    as last reported by them in any document, other than an 24    annual report, required by this Act to be filed with the 25    Secretary of State from their taxable year end to the next 26    succeeding anniversary month or, in the case of a   SB2276- 10 -LRB104 03809 HLH 13833 b1    corporation which has established an extended filing 2    month, the extended filing month of the surviving or new 3    corporation; however if the taxable year ends within the 4    2-month period immediately preceding the anniversary month 5    or, in the case of a corporation which has established an 6    extended filing month, the extended filing month of the 7    surviving or new corporation the tax will be computed to 8    the anniversary month or, in the case of a corporation 9    which has established an extended filing month, the 10    extended filing month of the surviving or new corporation 11    in the next succeeding calendar year.12        (d) An annual franchise tax payable each year with the 13    annual report which the corporation is required by this 14    Act to file.15    On or after January 1, 2020 and prior to January 1, 2021, 16the first $30 in liability is exempt from the tax imposed under 17this Section. On or after January 1, 2021 and prior to January 181, 2024, the first $1,000 in liability is exempt from the tax 19imposed under this Section. On or after January 1, 2024, and 20before January 1, 2025, the first $5,000 in liability is 21exempt from the tax imposed under this Section. On and after 22January 1, 2025 and before January 1, 2026, the first $10,000 23in liability is exempt from the tax imposed under this 24Section. The provisions of this Section shall not require the 25payment of any franchise tax that would otherwise have been 26due and payable on or after January 1, 2026. There shall be no   SB2276- 11 -LRB104 03809 HLH 13833 b1refunds or proration of franchise tax for any taxes due and 2payable on or after January 1, 2026 on the basis that a portion 3of the corporation's taxable year extends beyond January 1, 42026. 5    This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027. 6(Source: P.A. 102-282, eff. 1-1-22; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 7103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24.) 8    (805 ILCS 5/15.65)  (from Ch. 32, par. 15.65)9    Sec. 15.65. Franchise taxes payable by foreign 10corporations. For the privilege of exercising its authority to 11transact such business in this State as set out in its 12application therefor or any amendment thereto, each foreign 13corporation shall pay to the Secretary of State the following 14franchise taxes, computed on the basis, at the rates and for 15the periods prescribed in this Act:16        (a) An initial franchise tax at the time of filing its 17    application for authority to transact business in this 18    State.19        (b) An additional franchise tax at the time of filing 20    (1) a report of the issuance of additional shares, or (2) a 21    report of an increase in paid-in capital without the 22    issuance of shares, or (3) a report of cumulative changes 23    in paid-in capital or a report of an exchange or 24    reclassification of shares, whenever any such report 25    discloses an increase in its paid-in capital over the   SB2276- 12 -LRB104 03809 HLH 13833 b1    amount thereof last reported in any document, other than 2    an annual report, interim annual report or final 3    transition annual report, required by this Act to be filed 4    in the office of the Secretary of State.5        (c) Whenever the corporation shall be a party to a 6    statutory merger and shall be the surviving corporation, 7    an additional franchise tax at the time of filing its 8    report following merger, if such report discloses that the 9    amount represented in this State of its paid-in capital 10    immediately after the merger is greater than the aggregate 11    of the amounts represented in this State of the paid-in 12    capital of such of the merged corporations as were 13    authorized to transact business in this State at the time 14    of the merger, as last reported by them in any documents, 15    other than annual reports, required by this Act to be 16    filed in the office of the Secretary of State; and in 17    addition, the surviving corporation shall be liable for a 18    further additional franchise tax on the paid-in capital of 19    each of the merged corporations as last reported by them 20    in any document, other than an annual report, required by 21    this Act to be filed with the Secretary of State, from 22    their taxable year end to the next succeeding anniversary 23    month or, in the case of a corporation which has 24    established an extended filing month, the extended filing 25    month of the surviving corporation; however if the taxable 26    year ends within the 2-month period immediately preceding   SB2276- 13 -LRB104 03809 HLH 13833 b1    the anniversary month or the extended filing month of the 2    surviving corporation, the tax will be computed to the 3    anniversary or, extended filing month of the surviving 4    corporation in the next succeeding calendar year.5        (d) An annual franchise tax payable each year with any 6    annual report which the corporation is required by this 7    Act to file.8    On or after January 1, 2020 and prior to January 1, 2021, 9the first $30 in liability is exempt from the tax imposed under 10this Section. On or after January 1, 2021 and before January 1, 112024, the first $1,000 in liability is exempt from the tax 12imposed under this Section. On and after January 1, 2024 and 13before January 1, 2025, the first $5,000 in liability is 14exempt from the tax imposed under this Section. On and after 15January 1, 2025 and before January 1, 2026, the first $10,000 16in liability is exempt from the tax imposed under this 17Section. The provisions of this Section shall not require the 18payment of any franchise tax that would otherwise have been 19due and payable on or after January 1, 2026. There shall be no 20refunds or proration of franchise tax for any taxes due and 21payable on or after January 1, 2026 on the basis that a portion 22of the corporation's taxable year extends beyond January 1, 232026. 24    This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027. 25(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 26102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24.)   SB2276- 14 -LRB104 03809 HLH 13833 b1    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 2changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 3that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 4represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 5not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 6made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 7Public Act. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.